Idaho statutes. Title 10 ISSUES, TRIAL AND JUDGMENT IN CIVIL ACTIONS
Chapter 6
NEW TRIALS

Sec.

§ 10-601. New trial defined. [Repealed.]

§ 10-602. Grounds for new trial

Judgment notwithstanding the verdict. [Repealed.]

§ 10-603. Application for new trial. [Repealed.]

§ 10-604. Notice of intention. [Repealed.]

§ 10-605. Hearing of motion. [Repealed.]

§ 10-606. Ruling of motion. [Repealed.]

§ 10-607. Record on appeal. [Repealed.]

§ 10-608. New trial on motion of court. [Repealed.]

§ 10-609. Hearing in court or at chambers. [Repealed.]